Hawaii statutes.
§478-3 On judgment. Interest at the
rate of ten per cent a year, and no more, shall be allowed on any judgment
recovered before any court in the State, in any civil suit. [CC 1859, §1481; am
L 1868, p 9; am L 1898, c 4, §2; RL 1925, §3586; RL 1935, §7051; am L 1935, c
18, §1; RL 1945, §8732; RL 1955, §191-2; HRS §478-2; am L 1979, c 211, §1; am L
1981, c 9, §2; ren L 1986, c 137, pt of §1]

Cross References

Eminent domain, see §§101-25, 101-33.

Commencement date of interest, see §636-16.

Case Notes

Right to prejudgment interest. 381 F.2d 965, 971, aff'g 245
F. Supp. 981.

Foreign judgment, interest on. 8 H. 335.

Rate provided by the eminent domain statute relates back to
date of judgment where payment delayed more than thirty days, this section
being inapplicable. 45 H. 650, 372 P.2d 348. Compare 30 H. 1, 10, where
applicability of this section during the thirty day period was not appealed.

Section does not preclude prejudgment interest. 51 H. 346,
461 P.2d 140.

Decree in mortgage foreclosure action which only orders sale
of mortgaged property is not a money judgment upon which statutory interest
accrues. 60 H. 413, 591 P.2d 104.

Interest accrues only on judgments for an in personam
liability for money on a determined amount. 60 H. 467, 591 P.2d 1060.

Not applicable to interest assessed by arbitrator as
compensation or penalty to prevent further damages. 66 H. 663, 675 P.2d 760.

Section cannot be interpreted to allow postjudgment interest
on §636-16 prejudgment interest. 74 H. 1, 837 P.2d 1273.

Court did not abuse its discretion under this section and
§636-16 in awarding appellee ten per cent interest per annum on appellee's back
pay. 74 H. 599, 851 P.2d 311.

Nothing in the language of §431:15-323 or this section
precluded an award of post-judgment interest to insurance commissioner upon
final judgment awarding commissioner the unpaid premiums from customer of
liquidated mutual benefit society. 99 H. 53, 52 P.3d 823.

Insofar as the State has not expressly and statutorily waived
its sovereign immunity from postjudgment interest in suits brought pursuant to
§661-1, the State is immune from awards of postjudgment interest under this
section in §661-1 actions; thus, the trial court erred in ordering that the
employees' retirement system pay statutory interest at the rate of ten per cent
per annum, pursuant to this section. 106 H. 416, 106 P.3d 339.

Section not retroactive. 3 H. App. 646, 658 P.2d 898.

Plaintiff ex-wife was entitled to post-judgment interest on
the child support arrearage ex-husband owed; family court erred in failing to
award interest on the principal. 97 H. 160 (App.), 34 P.3d 1059.

Cited: 35 H. 352, 366; 36 H. 107, 109.

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next